Hawaii statutes.
§486-80 Impoundment of evidence. The
administrator may, for a period not to exceed ninety-six hours, impound as
evidence any passenger car in which an inaccurate or incorrect or inoperable
odometer system is installed or exists. Such period may be extended by order
of the court. [L 1988, c 156, pt of §3]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next